Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-9,106
Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program; created; purpose.

The Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program is created within the Department of Health and Human Services. The purpose of the Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program is to reduce the incidence of low birth weight, pre-term birth, and adverse birth outcomes while also addressing other lifestyle, behavioral, and nonmedical aspects of an at-risk mother's life that may affect the health and well-being of the mother or the child.

Laws 2024, LB857, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB958, § 5.
July 18, 2026